Utah statutes.
17C-3-107.   Notice of economic development project area plan adoption --
Effective date of plan -- Contesting the formation of the plan.
(1) (a)  Upon the community legislative body's adoption of an economic
development project area plan, the legislative body shall provide notice as
provided in Subsection (1)(b) by:
(i) (A)  publishing or causing to be published a notice:
(I)  in a newspaper of general circulation within the agency's boundaries; or
(II)  if there is no newspaper of general circulation within the agency's
boundaries, causing a notice to be posted in at least three public places
within the agency's boundaries; and
(B)  as required in Section 45-1-101.
(b)  Each notice under Subsection (1)(a) shall:
(i)  set forth the community legislative body's ordinance adopting the project
area plan or a summary of the ordinance; and
(ii)  include a statement that the project area plan is available for general
public inspection and the hours for inspection.
(2)  The project area plan shall become effective on the date of:
(a)  if notice was published under Subsection (1)(a), publication of the
notice; or
(b)  if notice was posted under Subsection (1)(a), posting of the notice.
(3) (a)  For a period of 30 days after the effective date of the project area
plan under Subsection (2), any person in interest may contest the project area
plan or the procedure used to adopt the project area plan if the plan or
procedure fails to comply with applicable statutory requirements.
(b)  After the 30-day period under Subsection (3)(a) expires, no person may
contest the project area plan or procedure used to adopt the project area plan
for any cause.
(4)  Upon adoption of the economic development project area plan by the
community's legislative body, the agency may carry out the project area plan.
(5)  Each agency shall make the adopted economic development project area plan
available to the general public at its offices during normal business hours.
